Wisconsin, session 2025, AB380.
do enact as follows:AB380,11Section 1. 757.91 of the statutes is amended to read:AB380,2,82757.91 Supreme court; disposition. The supreme court shall review the 3findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations under s. 757.89 and 4determine appropriate discipline in cases of misconduct and appropriate action in 5cases of permanent disability. If the supreme court imposes a suspension for 6misconduct, the suspension shall be without pay. The rules of the supreme court 7applicable to civil cases in the supreme court govern the review proceedings under 8this section.AB380,29Section 2. 757.95 of the statutes is amended to read:AB380,2,1510757.95 Temporary suspension by supreme court. The supreme court 11may, following the filing of a formal complaint or a petition by the commission, 12prohibit a judge or circuit or supplemental court commissioner from exercising the 13powers of a judge or circuit or supplemental court commissioner pending final 14determination of the proceedings. If the supreme court imposes a temporary 15suspension under this section, the suspension shall be without pay.AB380,2,1616